Utah statutes.
35A-1-302.   Review of administrative order -- Finality of Workforce Appeals
Board's order.
(1)  An order entered by an administrative law judge under this title is the
final decision of the department unless a further appeal is initiated under
this title and in accordance with the rules of the department governing the
review.
(2)  The order of the Workforce Appeals Board on review is final, unless set
aside by the court of appeals.
(3)  If an order is appealed to the court of appeals after the party appealing
the order has exhausted all administrative appeals, the court of appeals has
jurisdiction to review, reverse, or annul any order of the Workforce Appeals
Board, or to suspend or delay the operation or execution of the order of the
Workforce Appeals Board being appealed.
